Utah statutes.
58-68-305.   Exemptions from licensure.
In addition to the exemptions from licensure in Section 58-1-307, the
following individuals may engage in the described acts or practices without
being licensed under this chapter:
(1)  an individual rendering aid in an emergency, when no fee or other
consideration of value for the service is charged, received, expected, or
contemplated;
(2)  an individual administering a domestic or family remedy;
(3) (a) (i)  a person engaged in the lawful sale of vitamins, health foods,
dietary supplements, herbs, or other products of nature, the sale of which is
not otherwise prohibited by state or federal law; and
(ii)  a person acting in good faith for religious reasons, as a matter of
conscience, or based on a personal belief, when obtaining or providing any
information regarding health care and the use of any product under Subsection
(3)(a)(i); and
(b)  Subsection (3)(a) does not:
(i)  permit a person to diagnose any human disease, ailment, injury,
infirmity, deformity, pain, or other condition; or
(ii)  prohibit providing truthful and non-misleading information regarding any
of the products under Subsection (3)(a)(i);
(4)  a person engaged in good faith in the practice of the religious tenets of
any church or religious belief without the use of prescription drugs;
(5)  an individual authorized by the Department of Health under Section
26-1-30, to withdraw blood to determine the alcohol or drug content pursuant
to Section 41-6a-523;
(6)  a medical assistant while working under the direct and immediate
supervision of a licensed osteopathic physician, to the extent the medical
assistant is engaged in tasks appropriately delegated by the supervisor in
accordance with the standards and ethics of the practice of medicine;
(7)  an individual engaging in the practice of osteopathic medicine when:
(a)  the individual is licensed in good standing as an osteopathic physician
in another state with no licensing action pending and no less than ten years
of professional experience;
(b)  the services are rendered as a public service and for a noncommercial
purpose;
(c)  no fee or other consideration of value is charged, received, expected, or
contemplated for the services rendered beyond an amount necessary to cover the
proportionate cost of malpractice insurance; and
(d)  the individual does not otherwise engage in unlawful or unprofessional
conduct; and
(8)  an individual providing expert testimony in a legal proceeding.
